North Carolina statutes. Chapter 52C. Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.
Article 3. Civil Provisions of General Application.

Official Comment (2015)

This article adds a wide variety of procedural provisions to existing statutory and procedural rules for civil cases. If there is a conflict between those provisions found for other litigation and UIFSA rules set forth in this article, obviously UIFSA rules prevail. For example, it is unlikely that a state will have a provision for testimony by telephone or audiovisual means in a final hearing. Section 316 of this act creates such a right for an out-of-state individual. Revisions in this article shift the perspective slightly to accommodate the inclusion of a foreign support order in the equation. Many, but not all, of the provisions in this article are based upon the fact that a party does not “reside in this state.” Application of these provisions is not solely based on whether the absent party resides in “another state,” as formerly was the case. Rather, three distinct formulations are employed depending on the intended application of the provisions: “residing in a state;” “residing in . . . a foreign country;” or “residing outside this state.” The third alternative is intentionally the broadest because it includes persons residing anywhere and is not limited to persons residing in a “foreign country” as defined in Section 102.

§ 52C-3-301.
Proceedings under this Chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in this Chapter, this Article applies to all proceedings under this Chapter.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-117, s. 1, effective June 24, 2015.

An individual petitioner or a support enforcement agency may initiate a proceeding authorized under this Chapter by filing a petition in an initiating tribunal for forwarding to a responding tribunal or by filing a petition or a comparable pleading directly in a tribunal of another state or a foreign country which has or can obtain personal jurisdiction over the respondent.

History.

1995, c. 538, s. 7(c); 2015-117, s. 1.

Official Comment (2015)

Subsection (a) mandates application of the general provisions of this article to all UIFSA proceedings, including those affecting a foreign support order.

The statement in subsection (b) is axiomatic that the tribunal in which a petition is filed for establishment or enforcement of a support order, or for modification of a child-support order, must be able to assert personal jurisdiction over the respondent. It is also axiomatic that an individual petitioner requesting affirmative relief under this act submits to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal. Subsection (b) also continues reference to the basic two-state procedure long employed by the former reciprocal acts to establish a support order in the interstate context, but expands it to recognize foreign countries. Direct filing of a petition in a state tribunal by an individual or a support enforcement agency without reference to an initiating tribunal in another state was introduced by UIFSA (1992). UIFSA (2008) extends the direct filing capability to foreign countries as well.

Although the filing of a petition in an initiating tribunal to be forwarded to a responding tribunal is still recognized as an available procedure, the direct filing procedure has proven to be one of the most significant improvements in efficient interstate case management. The promulgation and use of the federally mandated, or substantially conforming, forms, Section 311(b), further serves to eliminate any role for the initiating tribunal. Incidentally, the Convention contains approved forms for use in Convention cases processed through a Central Authority.

Related to Convention: art. 2. Scope; art. 10. Available applications; art. 19. Scope of the chapter; art. 20. Bases for recognition and enforcement; art. 32. Enforcement under internal law; art. 33. Non-discrimination; art. 34. Enforcement measures; art.37. Direct requests to competent authorities; Annex 1. Transmittal form under Article 12(2); Annex 2. Acknowledgement form under Article 12(3).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-117, s. 1, effective June 24, 2015, deleted former subsection (b); and in subsection (c), substituted “initiate” for “commerce” following “agency may” and inserted “or a foreign country.”

§ 52C-3-302.
Proceeding by minor parent.

A minor parent, or a guardian or other legal representative of a minor parent, may maintain a proceeding on behalf of or for the benefit of the minor’s child.

History.

1995, c. 538, s. 7(c); 2015-117, s. 1.

Official Comment (2015)

A minor parent may maintain a proceeding under UIFSA without the appointment of a guardian ad litem, even if the law of the forum jurisdiction requires a guardian for an in-state case. If a guardian or legal representative has been appointed, he or she may act on behalf of the minor’s child in seeking support.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-117, s. 1, effective June 24, 2015, substituted “Proceeding” for “Action” in the section heading.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Identification of Minor Children as Complainants. —

In a proceeding under former Chapter 52A, where it appeared from examination of all documents transmitted to the North Carolina Court in accordance with the Act that support was being sought for minor dependents identified in the complaint, it was lawful for a North Carolina Court to order support payments for the minor dependents even though their names did not appear in the style of the case and the mother was identified on the complaint as the complainant. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. W.H.S. Burgwyn, Jr., Solicitor, 40 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 718 (1969).

§ 52C-3-303.
Application of law of this State.

Except as otherwise provided in this Chapter, a responding tribunal of this State shall:

Apply the procedural and substantive law generally applicable to similar proceedings originating in this State and may exercise all powers and provide all remedies available in those proceedings; and

Determine the duty of support and the amount payable in accordance with the law and support guidelines of this State.

History.

1995, c. 538, s. 7(c); 2015-117, s. 1.

Official Comment (2015)

Historically states have insisted that forum law be applied to support cases whenever possible. This continues to be a key principle of UIFSA. In general, a responding tribunal has the same powers in a proceeding involving parties in a case with interstate or international effect as it has in an intrastate case. This inevitably means that the act is not self-contained; rather, it is supplemented by the forum’s statutes and procedures governing support orders. To insure the efficient processing of the huge number of interstate support cases, it is vital that decision makers apply familiar rules of law to the maximum degree possible. This must be accomplished in a manner consistent with the overriding principle of UIFSA that enforcement is of the issuing tribunal’s order, and that the responding state does not make the order its own as a condition of enforcing it.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-117, s. 1, effective June 24, 2015, deleted “including the rules on choice of law” following “substantive law” in subdivision (1); and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 52C-3-304.
Duties of initiating tribunal.

Upon the filing of a petition authorized by this Chapter, an initiating tribunal of this State shall forward the petition and its accompanying documents:

To the responding tribunal or appropriate support enforcement agency in the responding state; or

If the identity of the responding tribunal is unknown, to the state information agency of the responding state with a request that they be forwarded to the appropriate tribunal and that receipt be acknowledged.

If requested by the responding tribunal, a tribunal of this State shall issue a certificate or other document and make findings required by the law of the responding state. If the responding tribunal is in a foreign country, upon request, the tribunal of this State shall specify the amount of support sought, convert that amount into the equivalent amount in the foreign currency under applicable official or market exchange rate as publicly reported, and provide any other documents necessary to satisfy the requirements of the responding foreign tribunal.

History.

1995, c. 538, s. 7(c); 1997-433, s. 10.4; 1998-17, s. 1; 2015-117, s. 1.

Official Comment (2015)

Subsection (a) was designed primarily to facilitate interstate enforcement between UIFSA states and URESA and RURESA states, with some applicability to cases involving foreign jurisdictions. Since 1998, by which time UIFSA had been enacted nationwide, the procedure described has gradually become an anachronism. Note, however, that the last RURESA child-support order may not expire until 2017 or 2018.
See
Prefatory Note.

Subsection (b), however, retains its utility with regard to a support order of a foreign nation. Supplying documentation required by a foreign jurisdiction, which is not otherwise required by UIFSA procedure, is appropriate in the international context. For example, a venerable process in British Commonwealth countries is known as provisional and confirming orders. A “provisional order” is a statement of the nonbinding amount of support being requested by a Canadian tribunal for establishment of a support order by a state responding tribunal. A state responding tribunal will receive information about the amount of support provisionally calculated by a tribunal in Canada. It needs to be borne in mind that a request to establish support from a Canadian tribunal will be accomplished in accordance with the law of the responding state. Thus, the Canadian provisional order is informative, but not binding on the responding tribunal. An order issued by the responding tribunal, whether for the amount suggested in the provisional order or another amount based on the local law of the responding tribunal, is known as a confirming order. Similarly, the initiating state’s tribunal, knowing that a provisional order will be required by the Canadian tribunal, is directed to cooperate and provide a statement of the amount of support being provisionally requested.

The initiating tribunal of this state also has a duty to identify the amount of foreign currency equivalent to its request to the Canadian tribunal and a corresponding duty for a responding tribunal to convert the foreign currency into dollars if the foreign initiating tribunal has not done so, Section 305(f). The reference to “the applicable official or market exchange rate” takes into account the present practices of international money markets. A few countries continue to maintain an official exchange rate for their currency. The vast majority of countries recognize the fact that the value of their currency is subject to daily market fluctuations that are reported on the financial pages of many daily newspapers. Thus, in the example described above, a request for a specific amount of support in U.S. dollars, which is to be translated into Canadian dollars on a specific date, will inevitably have a variable value as the foreign currency rises or falls against the U.S. dollar.

Related to Convention: art. 31. Decisions produced by the combined effect of provisional and confirmation orders.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-117, s. 1, effective June 24, 2015, deleted “three copies of” following “shall forward” in the introductory language of subsection (a); and rewrote subsection (b).

§ 52C-3-305.
Duties and powers of responding tribunal.

When a responding tribunal of this State receives a petition or comparable pleading from an initiating tribunal or directly pursuant to G.S. 52C-3-301(c) it shall cause the petition or pleading to be filed and notify the petitioner where and when it was filed.

A responding tribunal of this State, to the extent not prohibited by law, may do one or more of the following:

Establish or enforce a support order, modify a child support order, determine the controlling child support order, or determine parentage of a child;

Order an obligor to comply with a support order, specifying the amount and the manner of compliance;

Order income withholding;

Determine the amount of any arrears, and specify a method of payment;

Enforce orders by civil or criminal contempt, or both;

Set aside property for satisfaction of the support order;

Place liens and order execution on the obligor’s property;

Order an obligor to keep the tribunal informed of the obligor’s current residential address, electronic-mail address, telephone number, employer, address of employment, and telephone number at the place of employment;

Issue an order for arrest for an obligor who has failed after proper notice to appear at a hearing ordered by the tribunal and enter the order for arrest in any local and State computer systems for criminal warrants;

Order the obligor to seek appropriate employment by specified methods;

Award reasonable attorneys’ fees and other fees and costs; and

Grant any other available remedy.

A responding tribunal of this State shall include in a support order issued under this Chapter, or in the documents accompanying the order, the calculations on which the support order is based.

A responding tribunal of this State may not condition the payment of a support order issued under this Chapter upon compliance by a party with provisions for visitation.

If a responding tribunal of this State issues an order under this Chapter, the tribunal shall send a copy of the order to the petitioner and the respondent and to the initiating tribunal, if any.

If requested to enforce a support order, arrears, or judgment or modify a support order stated in a foreign currency, a responding tribunal of this State shall convert the amount stated in the foreign currency to the equivalent amount in dollars under the applicable official or market exchange rate as publicly reported.

History.

1995, c. 538, s. 7(c); 1997-433, s. 10.5; 1998-17, s. 1; 2015-117, s. 1.

Official Comment (2015)

This section establishes a wide variety of duties for a responding tribunal. It contains: ministerial functions, subsection (a); judicial functions, subsection (b); and, substantive rules applicable to interstate cases, subsections (c)-(e). Because a responding tribunal may be an administrative agency rather than a court, the act explicitly states that a tribunal is not granted powers that it does not otherwise possess under state law. For example, authority to enforce a support order by contempt generally is limited to courts.

Subsection (a) directs the filing of the documents received without regard to whether an initiating tribunal in another state was involved in forwarding the documentation. It also directs that the individual or entity requesting the filing be notified, but leaves the means of that notification to local law. The advent of a variety of swifter, and perhaps even more reliable, forms of notice in the modern era justifies the deletion of a particular form of notice. For example, many states now authorize notice by telephone facsimile (FAX), or by an express delivery service, and many legal documents are transmitted by electronic mail (email).

Subsection (b) lists duties that, if possessed under state law in connection with intrastate cases, are extended to the responding tribunal in UIFSA cases. Thus, each subdivision purposefully avoids mention of substantive rules. For example, subsection (b)(7) does not identify the type, nature, or priority of liens that may be issued under UIFSA. As is generally true under the act, those details will be determined by applicable state law concerning support enforcement remedies of local orders.

Subsection (c) clarifies that the details of calculating the child-support order are to be included along with the order. Local law generally requires that variation from the child support guidelines must be explained,
see
42 U.S.C. § 667; this requirement is extended to interstate cases.

Subsection (d) states that an interstate support order may not be conditioned on compliance with a visitation order. While this may be at variance with state law governing intrastate cases, under a UIFSA proceeding the petitioner generally is not present before the tribunal. This distinction justifies prohibiting visitation issues from being litigated in the context of a support proceeding. All states have enacted some version of either the UCCJA or the UCCJEA providing for resolution of visitation issues in interstate cases.

Subsection (e) introduces the policy determination that the petitioner, the respondent, and the initiating tribunal, if any, shall be kept informed about actions taken by the responding tribunal.

Subsection (f) is designed to facilitate enforcement of a foreign support order. Note that the language directing a conversion to a monetary equivalence in dollars is intended to make clear the equivalence is not a modification of the original order to an absolute dollar figure; rather, satisfaction of the obligation is to be determined by the order-issuing tribunal based on the present dollar value of the currency in which the order is denominated.

Related to Convention: art. 19. Scope of the Chapter; art. 34. Enforcement measures; art. 35. Transfer of funds; art. 43. Recovery of costs.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-117, s. 1, effective June 24, 2015, substituted “not prohibited” for “otherwise authorized” in the introductory language of subsection (b); in subdivision (b)(1), substituted “Establish” for “Issue” at the beginning, and substituted “determine the controlling child support order, or determine parentage of a child” for “or render a judgment to determine parentage”; inserted “electronic-mail address” in subdivision (b)(8); and added subsection (f).

§ 52C-3-306.
Inappropriate tribunal.

If a petition or comparable pleading is received by an inappropriate tribunal of this State, the tribunal shall forward the pleading and accompanying documents to an appropriate tribunal of this State or another state and notify the petitioner where and when the pleading was sent.

History.

1995, c. 538, s. 7(c); 1997-433, s. 10.6; 1998-17, s. 1; 2015-117, s. 1.

Official Comment (2015)

If a [petition] or comparable pleading is received by an inappropriate tribunal of this state, the tribunal shall forward the pleading and accompanying documents to an appropriate tribunal of this state or another state and notify the [petitioner] where and when the pleading was sent. A tribunal receiving UIFSA documents in error is to forward the original documents to their proper destination without undue delay. This section was originally intended to apply both to initiating and responding tribunals receiving such documents, but the practical elimination of the role of initiating tribunals under modern practice now limits the notice requirement to the petitioner, i.e., the individual party or support enforcement agency, that filed (or misfiled) the document directly. For example, if a tribunal is inappropriately designated as the responding tribunal, it shall forward the petition to the appropriate responding tribunal wherever located, if known, and notify the petitioner of its action. Such a procedure is much to be preferred to returning the documents to the petitioner to begin the process anew.

Cooperation of this sort will facilitate the ultimate goals of the act. Although by its terms this section applies only to a tribunal of this state, it can be anticipated that the support enforcement agency will also assist in transferring documents to the appropriate tribunal. Note the section does not contemplate that a state tribunal will forward documents to a tribunal in a foreign country.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-117, s. 1, effective June 24, 2015, substituted “the tribunal shall forward” for “it shall forward”, and substituted “of this State” for “in this State” preceding “or another state.”

§ 52C-3-307.
Duties of support enforcement agency.

In a proceeding under this Chapter, a support enforcement agency of this State, upon request, shall provide the following:

Services to a petitioner residing in a state.

Services to a petitioner requesting services through a central authority of a foreign country as described in G.S. 52C-1-102(3a)a. or d [G.S. 52C-1-101(3a)a. or d.].A support enforcement agency of this State may provide services to a petitioner who is an individual not residing in a state.

A support enforcement agency of this State that is providing services to the petitioner shall:

Take all steps necessary to enable an appropriate tribunal of this State, another state, or a foreign country to obtain jurisdiction over the respondent;

Request an appropriate tribunal to set a date, time, and place for a hearing;

Make a reasonable effort to obtain all relevant information, including information as to income and property of the parties;

Within two days, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, after receipt of notice in a record from an initiating, responding, or registering tribunal, send a copy of the notice to the petitioner;

Within two days, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, after receipt of communication in a record from the respondent or the respondent’s attorney, send a copy of the communication to the petitioner; and

Notify the petitioner if jurisdiction over the respondent cannot be obtained.

(b1)

A support enforcement agency of this State that requests registration of a child support order in this State for enforcement or for modification shall make reasonable efforts to:

(1)

Ensure that the order to be registered is the controlling order; or

(2)

If two or more child support orders exist and the identity of the controlling order has not been determined, ensure that a request for such a determination is made in a tribunal having jurisdiction to do so.

(b2)

A support enforcement agency of this State that requests registration and enforcement of a support order, arrears, or judgment stated in a foreign currency shall convert the amounts stated in the foreign currency into the equivalent amounts in dollars under the applicable official or market exchange rate as publicly reported.

(b3)

A support enforcement agency of this State shall issue or request a tribunal of this State to issue a child support order and an income-withholding order that redirect payment of current support, arrears, and interest if requested to do so by a support enforcement agency of another state pursuant to

G.S. 52C-3-318

.

This Chapter does not create or negate a relationship of attorney and client or other fiduciary relationship between a support enforcement agency or the attorney for the agency and the individual being assisted by the agency.

History.

1995, c. 538, s. 7(c); 1997-433, s. 10.7; 1998-17, s. 1; 2015-117, s. 1.

Official Comment (2015)

Federal legislation signed on Sept. 29, 2014 (P.L. 113-183) authorizes states to enact Alternative A or Alternative B of subsection (a). The focus of subsection (a) is on providing services to a petitioner. Either the obligee or the obligor may request services, and that request may be in the context of the establishment of an initial child-support order, enforcement or review and adjustment of an existing child-support order, or a modification of that order (upward or downward). Note that the section does not distinguish between child support and spousal support for purposes of providing services. Note also, the services available may differ significantly; for example, modification of spousal support is limited to the issuing tribunal. See Section 205(f).

Alternative A continues the longstanding rule that this state’s support enforcement agency shall provide services upon request to a petitioner seeking relief under this act. Under Alternative B, the support agency may exercise discretion to provide or not provide assistance to an applicant: (1) from a reciprocating country or Convention country who does not apply through the Central Authority of his or her own country, but rather applies directly to the support enforcement agency; and (2) residing overseas in a country other than a reciprocating country or Convention country. The lack of services, of course, may impact the means by which an individual is able to obtain assistance in pursuing an action in the appropriate tribunal.

Subsection (b) responds to the past complaints of many petitioners that they were not properly kept informed about the progress of their requests for services.

Subsection (c) is a procedural clarification reflecting actual practice of the support agencies developed after years of experience with the act. It imposes a duty on all support enforcement agencies to facilitate the UIFSA one-order world by actively searching for cases with multiple orders and obtaining a determination of the controlling order as expeditiously as possible. This agency duty correlates to new Subsection 602(d) regarding the registration process and cases with multiple orders.

Subsection (d) imposes a duty of currency conversion on a support enforcement agency similar to that imposed on an initiating tribunal in Section 304(b).

Read in conjunction with Section 319, subsection (e) requires the state support enforcement agency to facilitate redirection of the stream of child support in order that payments be more efficiently received by the obligee.

Subsection (f) explicitly states that UIFSA neither creates nor rejects the establishment of an attorney-client or fiduciary relationship between the support enforcement agency and a petitioner receiving services from that agency. This once-highly controversial issue is left to otherwise applicable state law, which generally has concluded that attorneys employed by a state support enforcement agency do not form an attorney-client relationship with either the parties or the child as the ultimate obligee.

Related to Convention: art. 35. Transfer of funds.

§ 52C-3-308.
Duty of Department.

If the Department determines that the support enforcement agency is neglecting or refusing to provide services to an individual, the Department may order the agency to perform its duties under this Chapter or may provide those services directly to the individual.

The Department may determine that a foreign country has established a reciprocal arrangement for child support with this State and take appropriate action for notification of the determination.

History.

1995, c. 538, s. 7(c); 2015-117, s. 1.

Official Comment (2015)

Subsection (b) makes clear that a state has a variety of options in determining the international scope of its IV-D support enforcement program. Of course, a federal declaration that a foreign jurisdiction is a reciprocating country or political subdivision is controlling.
See
Section 102(5)(A). However, each state may designate an official with authority to make a statewide, binding determination recognizing a foreign country, foreign nation state, or political subdivision as having a reciprocal arrangement with that state.

See

Section 102(5)(B).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-117, s. 1, effective June 24, 2015, rewrote the section, which formerly read: “It shall be the duty of the district attorney to represent the obligee in proceedings authorized by this Chapter unless alternative arrangements are made by the obligee. An obligee may employ private counsel to represent the obligee in proceedings authorized by this Chapter.”

§ 52C-3-308.1.
Private counsel.

An individual may employ private counsel to represent the individual in proceedings authorized by this Chapter.

History.

2015-117, s. 1.

Official Comment (2015)

The right of a party to retain private counsel in a proceeding brought under UIFSA is explicitly recognized. The failure to clearly recognize that power under the prior uniform acts led to confusion and inconsistent decisions. The Convention implicitly recognizes that the right to employ an attorney is to be available in every Convention country, but does not explicitly mention retaining private counsel. A “competent authority” in Convention terminology is equivalent to a tribunal.

§ 52C-3-309.
Duties of State information agency.

The Department is the State information agency under this Chapter.

The State information agency shall:

Compile and maintain a current list, including addresses, of the tribunals in this State which have jurisdiction under this Chapter and any support enforcement agencies in this State and transmit a copy to the state information agency of every other state;

Maintain a register of names and addresses of tribunals and support enforcement agencies received from other states;

Forward to the appropriate tribunal in the county in this State in which the obligee who is an individual or the obligor resides, or in which the obligor’s property is believed to be located, all documents concerning a proceeding under this Chapter received from another state or a foreign country; and

Obtain information concerning the location of the obligor and the obligor’s property within this State not exempt from execution, by such means as postal verification and federal or state locator services, examination of telephone directories, requests for the obligor’s address from employers, and examination of governmental records, including, to the extent not prohibited by other law, those relating to real property, vital statistics, law enforcement, taxation, motor vehicles, drivers licenses, and social security.

History.

1995, c. 538, s. 7(c); 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2015-117, s. 1.

Official Comment (2015)

Subsection (a) identifies the state information agency.

Subsection (b) details the duties of that agency insofar as interstate proceedings are concerned. Subsection (b)(4) does not provide independent access to the information sources or to the governmental documents listed. Because states have different requirements and limitations concerning such access based on differing views of the privacy interests of individual citizens, the agency is directed to use all lawful means under the relevant state law to obtain and disseminate information.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-117, s. 1, effective June 24, 2015, substituted “The Department is the” for “The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, is designated as the” in subsection (a); inserted “names and addresses of” in subdivision (b)(2); and in subdivision (b)(3), substituted “county in this State in which the oblige who is an individual” for “place in this State in which the individual obligee”, and substituted “another state or a foreign country; and” for “an initiating tribunal or the state information agency of the initiating state; and.”

§ 52C-3-310.
Pleadings and accompanying documents.

In a proceeding under this Chapter, a petitioner seeking to establish a support order, to determine parentage of a child, or to register and modify a support order of a tribunal of another state or a foreign country must file a petition. Unless otherwise ordered under

G.S. 52C-3-311

, the petition or accompanying documents must provide, so far as known, the name, residential address, and social security numbers of the obligor and the obligee or the parent and alleged parent, and the name, sex, residential address, social security number, and date of birth of each child for whose benefit support is sought or whose parentage is to be determined. Unless filed at the time of registration, the petition must be accompanied by a copy of any support order known to have been issued by another tribunal. The petition may include any other information that may assist in locating or identifying the respondent.

The petition must specify the relief sought. The petition and accompanying documents must conform substantially with the requirements imposed by the forms mandated by federal law for use in cases filed by a support enforcement agency.

History.

1995, c. 538, s. 7(c); 2015-117, s. 1.

Official Comment (2015)

This section establishes the basic requirements for drafting and filing interstate pleadings. Subsection (a) should be read in conjunction with Section 312, which provides for the confidentiality of certain information if disclosure is likely to result in harm to a party or a child. The goal of this section is to improve efficiency of the process by attaching all known support orders to the petition, coupled with the elimination of the requirement that such copies be certified. If a dispute arises over the authenticity of a purported order, the tribunal must, of necessity, sort out conflicting claims at that time. Another improvement is the deletion of the requirement for verified pleadings originated in URESA and carried forward in the original version of UIFSA. Note, however, that a request for registration of a foreign support order for which the Convention is in force is subject to Section 706. This is due to the fact that the list of documents comprising the required record in subsection (a) differs in a measurable degree with Convention articles 11 and 25.

Subsection (b) provides authorization for the use of the federally authorized forms to be used in interstate cases in connection with the IV-D child-support enforcement program and mandates substantial compliance with those forms. Although the use of other forms is not prohibited, standardized documents have resulted in substantial improvement in the efficient processing of UIFSA proceedings. The Convention also contains annexed forms for international use.

Related to Convention: art. 10. Available applications; art. 11. Application contents; art. 12. Transmission, receipt and processing of applications and cases through Central Authorities; art. 25. Documents; Annex 1. Transmittal form under Article 12(2); Annex 2. Acknowledgement form under Article 12(3).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-117, s. 1, effective June 24, 2015, rewrote the first three sentences of subsection (a).

§ 52C-3-311.
Nondisclosure of information in exceptional circumstances.

If a party alleges in an affidavit or a pleading under oath that the health, safety, or liberty of a party or child would be jeopardized by disclosure of specific identifying information, that information must be sealed and may not be disclosed to the other party or the public. After a hearing in which a tribunal takes into consideration the health, safety, or liberty of the party or child, the tribunal may order disclosure of information that the tribunal determines to be in the interest of justice.

History.

1995, c. 538, s. 7(c); 2015-117, s. 1.

Official Comment (2015)

UIFSA (1992) recognized that enforcement of child support across state lines might have an unintended consequence of putting a party or child at risk if domestic violence was involved in the past. This section is a substantial revision of the statutory formulation originally developed in UIFSA (1992). It conforms to the comparable provision in the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act Section 209. Public awareness of and sensitivity to the dangers of domestic violence has significantly increased since interstate enforcement of support originated. This section authorizes confidentiality in instances where there is a risk of domestic violence or child abduction. Section 712,
infra
, incorporates language from the Convention to restrict dissemination of personal jurisdiction to protect victims of domestic violence.

Although local law generally governs the conduct of the forum tribunal, state law may not provide for maintaining secrecy about the exact whereabouts of a litigant or other information ordinarily required to be disclosed under state law, i.e., Social Security number of the parties or the child. If so, this section creates a confidentiality provision that is particularly appropriate in light of the intractable problems associated with interstate parental kidnapping,
see
the Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act (PKPA), 28 U.S.C. § 1738A.

Related to Convention: art. 38. Protection of personal data; art. 39. Confidentiality; art. 40. Non-disclosure of information.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-117, s. 1, effective June 24, 2015, rewrote the section.

§ 52C-3-312.
Costs and fees.

The petitioner shall not be required to pay a filing fee or other costs.

If an obligee prevails, a responding tribunal of this State may assess against an obligor filing fees, reasonable attorneys’ fees, other costs, and necessary travel and other reasonable expenses incurred by the obligee and the obligee’s witnesses. The tribunal may not assess fees, costs, or expenses against the obligee or the support enforcement agency of either the initiating or the responding state or foreign country, except as provided by other law. Attorneys’ fees may be taxed as costs, and may be ordered paid directly to the attorney, who may enforce the order in the attorney’s own name. Payment of support owed to the obligee has priority over fees, costs, and expenses.

The tribunal shall order the payment of costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees if it determines that a hearing was requested primarily for delay. In a proceeding under Article 6 of this Chapter, a hearing is presumed to have been requested primarily for delay if a registered support order is confirmed or enforced without change.

History.

1995, c. 538, s. 7(c); 2015-117, s. 1.

Official Comment (2015)

Subsection (a) permits either party, i.e., as petitioner, to file without payment of a filing fee or other costs. This provision dates back to UIFSA (1992) when the term “unfunded mandate” was basically unknown.

Subsection (b), however, provides that only the support obligor may be assessed the authorized costs and fees by a tribunal. Federal law permits a state support enforcement agency to charge limited fees and to recover administrative costs from applicants for Title IV-D services, but many states have opted not to do so, or only to seek recovery from the obligor.

Subsection (c) provides a sanction to deal with a frivolous contest regarding compliance with an interstate withholding order, registration of a support order, or comparable delaying tactics regarding an appropriate enforcement remedy.

Related to Convention: art. 14. Effective access to procedures; art. 43. Recovery of costs.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-117, s. 1, effective June 24, 2015, in subsection (b), inserted “of this State” following “tribunal” in the first sentence, and inserted “or foreign country” in the second sentence.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Detecting Good Public Policy Rationales for the American Rule: A Response to the Ill Conceived Calls for ‘Loser Pays’ Rules,” see 66 Duke L.J. 729 (2016).